Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 89

Convention Center Authorities Act of 2009

7-89-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Convention Center Authorities Act of 2009.”

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-102. Legislative findings — Purpose — Liberal construction.

It is found and determined that:

There is an immediate need to promote and further develop tourism, convention and employment opportunities in this state, by facilitating the acquisition, construction and rehabilitation of convention center facilities along with associated hotel accommodations; transportation infrastructure; tourism, theatre, retail business and commercial office space facilities; parking facilities; parks; greenways; open space and any and all facilities related to any of these;

The development of such facilities will provide a means to attract conventions, public assemblies, conferences, trade exhibitions or other business, social, cultural, scientific and public interest events to the state, enhance the state's image as a convention destination, and encourage and foster economic development and prosperity and employment within the state;

An authority is needed in individual communities to prepare comprehensive, long-range master plans for the orderly development of convention center facilities and to promote related activities; and

In many instances, effective cooperation between various units of government has been hampered because of inadequate statutory authority.

It is the purpose of this chapter to address these findings by providing for the establishment of convention center authorities to plan, promote, finance, construct, acquire, renovate, equip and enlarge convention center facilities along with associated hotel accommodations; transportation infrastructure; tourist, theatre and retail business facilities; commercial offices; parking lots or garages and any and all facilities related to any of these. The primary purpose of any and all such facilities shall be the conduct and service of conventions, public assemblies, conferences, trade exhibitions or other business, social, cultural, scientific and public interest events and related activities, but use of these facilities need not be limited to those events.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with its purpose.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “convention center authority” means any public corporation organized pursuant to this chapter;

“Board” or “board of directors” means the governing body of the authority;

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority issued pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any other law, as supplemented by, or in conjunction with, this chapter;

“Contracting party” or “other contracting party” means any party, including a municipality, to a sale contract, lease agreement or loan agreement, other than the authority;

“Cost”, as applied to any project, means and includes the cost of acquisition, construction, extension, enlargement or improvement; the cost of labor, materials and equipment; the cost of all lands, property rights, easements and franchises required; financing charges, interest and debt service prior to and during construction and up to twenty-four (24) months thereafter; costs of plans and specifications, services and estimates of costs and of revenues; costs of engineering, architectural and legal services; all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of such acquisitions or constructions and any and all other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition, construction, improvement or financing authorized in this chapter;

“Governing body” means the body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality are vested;

“Joint venture” means a partnership or any other type of business relationship or organization, such as a corporation, trust, partnership, public-private partnership, limited liability company, association, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality that is sponsored, owned, operated, or governed by two (2) or more entities;

“Loan agreement” means an agreement providing for an authority to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to this chapter to one (1) or more contracting parties to be used to pay the cost of one (1) or more projects and providing for the repayment of the loan by the other contracting party or parties;

“Municipality” means any county, metropolitan government or incorporated city or town in this state with respect to which an authority may be organized;

“Project” means any land, improvement, structure, building or part of a building comprised of facilities for conventions, public assemblies, conferences, trade exhibitions or other business, social, cultural, scientific and public interest events, along with any associated hotel accommodations; transportation infrastructure; tourism, theatre, retail business and commercial office space facilities; parking facilities or any other structure or facility constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter, and also includes, but is not limited to, parks, greenways, open spaces, roads, streets, highways, curbs, bridges, flood control facilities and utility services, such as water, sanitary sewer, electricity, gas and natural gas and telecommunications that are constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired as a supporting system or facility for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter; provided, that any such supporting system or facility is dedicated for public use;

“Revenues” of a project means all revenues derived from and on account of a project, directly or indirectly, including payments under a lease or sale contract and repayments under a loan agreement, or under notes, debentures, bonds and other secured or unsecured debt obligations of a lessee or contracting party delivered as provided in this chapter, and any moneys paid, contributed or pledged to an authority by the state or a municipality pursuant to law, agreement or otherwise;

“Sale contract” means a contract providing for the sale of one (1) or more projects to one (1) or more contracting parties and includes a contract providing for payment of the purchase price in one (1) or more installments; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee and, unless otherwise indicated by the context, any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality of the state, now or hereafter existing.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-104. Adoption of resolution to form authority.

If the governing body of a municipality, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that a convention center authority of the municipality be formed, authorizes the chief executive officer of the municipality to form the authority and approves the form of corporate charter proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the chief executive officer of the municipality shall execute, acknowledge and file a charter for the authority as provided in §7-89-106. No authority may be formed unless the governing body of a municipality has adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-105. Charter contents.

The charter shall set forth:

The name of the authority, which shall be the convention center authority of the city, county or metropolitan government of , where the blank is to be filled in with the name of the municipality, if the name is available for use by the authority, and if not available, then the chief executive officer of the municipality shall designate some other similar name that is available;

A recital that permission to organize the authority has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of the resolution;

The location of the principal office of the authority;

The purposes for which the authority is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the authority;

The period, which may be perpetual, for the duration of the authority;

A provision addressing conflicts of interest of members of the board of directors of the convention center authority; and

Any other matter that the chief executive officer of the municipality may choose to insert in the charter that is not inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of the state.

The charter shall be subscribed and acknowledged by the chief executive officer of the municipality.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-106. Filing of charter.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with §7-89-105, the charter shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall examine the charter and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the charter are correct, that the requirements of §7-89-104 have been complied with and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another authority already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the charter and accept it for filing. When the charter has been so made, filed and approved, the authority shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the charter.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-107. Amendment of charter.

The charter may, at any time and from time to time, be amended in a manner not inconsistent with §7-89-105. Any such amendment shall be adopted in the following manner:

The board of directors of the authority shall file with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to amend the charter, setting forth the proposed amendment to be made;

If the governing body, by appropriate resolution, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and authorizes the amendment to be made, approving the form of the proposed amendment, then the chair of the board of directors of the authority shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment, and shall file the amendment with the secretary of state;

The secretary of state shall examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that the requirements of this section have been complied with, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and accept it for filing in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office; and

When the amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall become effective.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-108. Board of directors.

The authority shall have a board of directors in which all corporate powers of the authority shall be vested. The board shall consist of no fewer than seven (7) directors, all of whom shall be duly qualified voters of the municipality. A director shall serve without compensation, except that the authority may reimburse a director for actual expenses incurred in the performance of a director's duties. A director may not be an elected official or employee of the municipality. The directors shall have staggered terms.

The initial board of directors shall be divided into three (3) groups containing substantially equal numbers. The initial term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years; the initial term of the directors included in the second group shall be three (3) years; and the initial term of the directors included in the third group shall be four (4) years. All subsequent terms of directors shall be four (4) years; provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor has not been appointed, the director whose term of office has expired shall continue to hold office until the director's successor is appointed.

In the case of authorities created pursuant to the approval of two (2) or more municipalities acting jointly, as provided in § 7-89-120, the number of directors appointed by the governing body of each municipality shall be as nearly equal as practicable.

The chief executive officer of the municipality shall appoint all directors, and the governing body of the municipality shall by resolution confirm the appointments of the chief executive officer. The chief executive officer of the municipality shall strive to ensure that the board is composed of directors who are diverse in professional background, educational background, ethnicity, race, gender, geographic residency, heritage, perspective and experience. The chief executive officer of the municipality shall strive to appoint at least one (1) director who is female and at least one (1) director who is a racial minority. When the chief executive officer makes the initial appointments, the chief executive officer shall designate which directors serve an initial term of two (2), three (3) and four (4) years, respectively.

If a vacancy occurs in the position of director, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original term for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect one (1) of its members as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as secretary and one (1) as treasurer, and these offices shall annually be filled in like manner. The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same director. In the event of the resignation or death of the chair, vice chair, secretary or treasurer, another member may be elected to fill the vacancy for the anticipated term of the chair, vice chair, secretary or treasurer.

Any meeting of the board of directors for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public. Any action taken by the directors under this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The concurring vote of a majority of the directors voting at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be necessary for the exercise of any of the powers granted by this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-109. Authority shall be public nonprofit corporation — Powers of authority.

Each convention center authority created pursuant to this chapter shall be a public nonprofit corporation and a public instrumentality of the municipality with respect to which the authority is organized. The authority shall have the following powers, together with all powers incidental to the following powers or necessary for the performance of those powers, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the charter, unless sooner dissolved as provided in § 7-89-119;

Sue and be sued and to prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease or otherwise, and design, plan, site, construct, improve, repair, extend, equip, furnish, operate and maintain one (1) or more projects, which projects shall be within at least one (1) of the municipalities with respect to which the authority has been created, including all real and personal properties that the board of directors of the authority may deem necessary in connection with the projects and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence, and including the power to demolish such existing structures as may be on sites acquired when those structures are not needed for the project;

Appoint officers, agents and employees, describe their qualifications and fix their compensation;

Operate, maintain, manage and enter into contracts for the operation, maintenance and management of any project undertaken, and to make rules and regulations with regard to the operation, maintenance and management;

Employ, contract with, fix the compensation of and discharge engineering, architectural, legal, financial and other professional experts, consultants, agents and employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to provide for the proper construction, operation and maintenance of any project;

Lease, rent and contract for the operation of all or any part of any project and charge and collect rent for the project and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations of the lease; and include in or exclude from any such lease provisions that the lessee shall have the option to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent as shall be determined by the board of directors;

Lease such space in a project as from time to time may not be needed for convention center related purposes to any other person, corporation, partnership or association for such purposes as the board of directors may determine are in the best interest of the authority or will help facilitate the purposes for which the authority was created, and upon such terms and in such manner as the board may determine;

Fix and collect rates, rentals, fees and charges for the use of any and all of the projects of the authority and for the naming rights relating to any and all of the projects of the authority;

Make contracts, including, without limitation, contracts with vendors, concessionaires, tenants or convention center facility users, or both, occupant managers and service providers;

Advertise within or without the state any of the projects of the authority;

Sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its properties, whenever the board of directors shall find the action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the authority was organized; provided, however, that the authority may not sell, exchange, donate or convey all or substantially all of its properties without the prior approval, by resolution, of the governing body of the municipality;

Procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance, surety or performance bond, or indemnity against loss or damage to property from any cause, including, but not limited to, general errors and omissions, property loss and casualty, loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employer's liability, against any act of any member, officer or employee of the authority in the performance of the duties of such person's office or employment, or the authority itself, or any other insurable risk, as the board of directors, in its discretion, may deem necessary, and to exercise all rights, immunities and protections afforded by Tennessee law and the Governmental Tort Liability Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 20;

Accept donations, contributions, revenues, capital grants or gifts of any kind from any individuals, associations, public or private corporations and municipalities, the state or the United States, or any agency or instrumentality of the state or the United States, for or in aid of any of the purposes of this chapter and enter into agreements in connection with the donations, contributions, revenues, capital grants or gifts;

Enter into joint ventures with third parties for the purpose of owning a project or any portion of a project, on such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the authority may determine;

Borrow money from time to time and, in evidence of any obligation incurred, issue and sell its revenue bonds in accordance with this chapter, in such form and upon such terms as its board of directors may determine and as approved by resolution of the governing body of the creating municipality, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions or other revenues specifically provided to the authority, for the purpose of financing the cost of any project, refund and refinance, from time to time, revenue bonds so issued and sold as often as may be deemed to be advantageous by the board of directors and, pending the issuance of its revenue bonds for the purposes in this chapter authorized, issue its interim certificates or notes or other temporary obligations;

Enter into any agreement or contract with any lessee who, pursuant to the terms of this chapter, is renting or is about to rent from the authority all or part of any building or buildings or facilities, whereby, under such agreement or contract, the lessee obligates itself to pay all or part of the cost of maintaining and operating the premises so leased. The agreement may be included as a provision of any lease entered into pursuant to the terms of this chapter or may be made the subject of a separate agreement or contract between the authority and the lessee;

Mortgage and pledge as security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any revenue bonds so issued and any agreements made in connection with the bonds, any or all of the projects or any part or parts of the projects, whether then owned or thereafter acquired;

Exercise all powers expressly given in its charter and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the charter or this chapter deemed expedient for the management of the affairs of the authority;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease or otherwise, and improve, repair, extend, equip, furnish, operate and maintain any roads, streets, highways, curbs, bridges, flood control facilities, utility services such as water, sanitary sewer, electricity, gas and natural gas and telecommunications that the board of directors of the convention center authority deems to be necessary, expedient or advisable in connection with the development or operation of any project; dedicate any such highways, roads or services to the public use; enter into any contract to facilitate these purposes and make any payments required under the contracts; borrow funds for the purpose of making any payment authorized by this subdivision (21) and pledge and otherwise use the revenues of the authority to repay the borrowed funds;

Establish, secure, own, develop and hold patents, copyrights, trademarks and service marks and enforce its rights with respect to the copyrights and marks; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A convention center owned by a nonprofit organization that is created by a government entity is considered a “government-owned convention center” within the meaning of T.C.A. §67-4-1425(c)(2). OAG 14-04, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/9/14).

7-89-110. Annual audit and report.

The board of directors of each authority shall cause an annual audit to be made of the books and records of its authority. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that the audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that the audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

The audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the authority fails or refuses to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant, or direct the department of audit, to prepare the audit, the cost of the audit to be paid by the authority.

Each authority shall prepare an annual report of its business affairs and transactions. A copy of the report and a copy of the annual audit referenced in subsection (a) shall be filed annually with the governing body of the municipality granting permission to the authority to organize.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.

7-89-111. Municipal support of projects — Assignment or loan of employees and provision of facilities to authority — Acceptance of donations— Reversion of property to donor.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating with an authority, the municipality authorizing the authority may assign or loan any of its employees, including its engineering staff, and facilities, or those of its agencies and instrumentalities; may provide necessary office space, equipment, and other facilities for the use of the authority and may provide or cause its agencies and instrumentalities to provide such services, all as the governing body of the municipality shall approve by resolution.

The governing body of the municipality may enter into a lease of any project or part of a project, and may make donations of property, real or personal, or cash grants to the authority, in such amount or amounts as it may deem proper and appropriate in aiding the authority to accomplish its purpose, all as the governing body of the municipality shall approve by resolution.

Any municipality authorizing an authority that enters into a lease with an authority may convey real property or personal property to the authority and may include a provision in the conveyance for the reversion of the property to the transferor at such time as all revenue bonds or other obligations of the authority incident to the real property so conveyed have been paid in full, all as the governing body of the municipality shall approve by resolution, and any authority created pursuant to this chapter is authorized to accept such a conveyance.

Acts 2009, ch. 474, § 1.